Massachusetts, session 194th, H2544.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, Section 179 of Chapter 77 of the 
Acts of 2023 is amended by adding after “provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be 
expended for the establishment of a career pathway program to support certified nurses’ aides, 
home health aides, homemakers and other entry-level workers in long-term care facilities to 
become licensed practical nurses” the following: -   
“or registered nurses, or for licensed practical nurses in long term care facilities to 
become registered nurses; provided further that students from the commonwealth who: (i) are 
enrolled in and pursuing a program of higher education at a public community college in the 
commonwealth or (ii) a Practical Nursing Program at a Career/Vocational Technical Education 
School shall be eligible for this career pathway financial assistance.”